Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. Terms of Employment Generally.
§ 22.1-298.1.
(For Effective Date, see Acts 2022, cc. 549, 550, cl. 2) Regulations governing licensure.

As used in this section:

“Alternate route to licensure”
means a nontraditional route to teacher licensure available to individuals who meet the criteria specified in the guidelines developed pursuant to subsection N or regulations issued by the Board of Education.

“Industry certification credential”
means an active career and technical education credential that is earned by successfully completing a Board of Education-approved industry certification examination, being issued a professional license in the Commonwealth, or successfully completing an occupational competency examination.

“Licensure by reciprocity”
means a process used to issue a license to an individual coming into the Commonwealth from another state when that individual meets certain conditions specified in the Board of Education’s regulations.

“Professional teacher’s assessment”
means those tests mandated for licensure as prescribed by the Board of Education.

“Provisional license”
means a nonrenewable license issued by the Board of Education for a specified period of time, not to exceed three years, to an individual who may be employed by a school division in the Commonwealth and who generally meets the requirements specified in the Board of Education’s regulations for licensure, but who may need to take additional coursework, pass additional assessments, or meet alternative evaluation standards to be fully licensed with a renewable license.

“Renewable license”
means a license issued by the Board of Education for 10 years to an individual who meets the requirements specified in the Board of Education’s regulations.

The Board of Education shall prescribe, by regulation, the requirements for the licensure of teachers and other school personnel required to hold a license. Such regulations shall include procedures for (i) the denial, suspension, cancellation, revocation, and reinstatement of licensure; (ii) written reprimand of license holders on grounds established by the Board, in accordance with law, notice of which shall be made by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to division superintendents or their designated representatives; and (iii) the immediate and thorough investigation by the division superintendent or his designee of any complaint alleging that a license holder has engaged in conduct that may form the basis for the revocation of his license. At a minimum, such procedures for investigations contained in such regulations shall require (a) the division superintendent to petition for the revocation of the license upon completing such investigation and finding that there is reasonable cause to believe that the license holder has engaged in conduct that forms the basis for revocation of a license; (b) the school board to proceed to a hearing on such petition for revocation within 90 days of the mailing of a copy of the petition to the license holder, unless the license holder requests the cancellation of his license in accordance with Board regulations; and (c) the school board to provide a copy of the investigative file and such petition for revocation to the Superintendent of Public Instruction at the time that the hearing is scheduled. The Board of Education shall revoke the license of any person for whom it has received a notice of dismissal or resignation pursuant to subsection F of § 22.1-313 and, in the case of a person who is the subject of a founded complaint of child abuse or neglect, after all rights to any administrative appeal provided by §

63.2-1526

have been exhausted. Regardless of the authority of any other agency of the Commonwealth to approve educational programs, only the Board of Education shall have the authority to license teachers to be regularly employed by school boards, including those teachers employed to provide nursing education.

The Board of Education shall prescribe by regulation the licensure requirements for teachers who teach only online courses, as defined in § 22.1-212.23. Such license shall be valid only for teaching online courses. Teachers who hold a 10-year renewable license issued by the Board of Education may teach online courses for which they are properly endorsed.

The Board of Education’s regulations shall include requirements that a person seeking initial licensure:

Demonstrate proficiency in the relevant content area, communication, literacy, and other core skills for educators by achieving a qualifying score on professional assessments or meeting alternative evaluation standards as prescribed by the Board. The literacy assessment for any individual seeking initial licensure with an endorsement in early/primary education preschool through grade three, elementary education preschool through grade six, special education general curriculum kindergarten through grade 12, special education deaf and hard of hearing preschool through grade 12, or special education blindness/visual impairments preschool through grade 12 or as a reading specialist shall include a rigorous test of science-based reading research and evidence-based literacy instruction;

Complete study in attention deficit disorder;

Complete study in gifted education, including the use of multiple criteria to identify gifted students; and

Complete study in methods of improving communication between schools and families and ways of increasing family involvement in student learning at home and at school.

In addition, such regulations shall include requirements that:

Every person seeking initial licensure and persons seeking licensure renewal as teachers who have not completed such study shall complete study in child abuse recognition and intervention in accordance with curriculum guidelines developed by the Board of Education in consultation with the Department of Social Services that are relevant to the specific teacher licensure routes;

Every person seeking renewal of a license shall complete all renewal requirements, including professional development in a manner prescribed by the Board, except that no person seeking renewal of a license shall be required to satisfy any such requirement by completing coursework and earning credit at an institution of higher education;

Every person seeking initial licensure or renewal of a license shall provide evidence of completion of certification or training in emergency first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and the use of automated external defibrillators. The certification or training program shall (i) be based on the current national evidence-based emergency cardiovascular care guidelines for cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator, such as a program developed by the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross, and (ii) include hands-on practice of the skills necessary to perform cardiopulmonary resuscitation. The Board shall provide a waiver for this requirement for any person with a disability whose disability prohibits such person from completing the certification or training;

Every person seeking licensure with an endorsement as a teacher of the blind and visually impaired shall demonstrate proficiency in reading and writing Braille;

Every teacher seeking an initial license in the Commonwealth with an endorsement in the area of career and technical education shall have an industry certification credential in the area in which the teacher seeks endorsement. If a teacher seeking an initial license in the Commonwealth has not attained an industry certification credential in the area in which the teacher seeks endorsement, the Board may, upon request of the employing school division or educational agency, issue the teacher a provisional license to allow time for the teacher to attain such credential;

Every person seeking initial licensure or renewal of a license shall complete awareness training, provided by the Department, on the indicators of dyslexia, as that term is defined by the Board pursuant to regulations, and the evidence-based interventions and accommodations for dyslexia;

Every person seeking initial licensure or renewal of a license with an endorsement as a school counselor shall complete training in the recognition of mental health disorder and behavioral distress, including depression, trauma, violence, youth suicide, and substance abuse;

Every person seeking initial licensure as a teacher who has not received the instruction described in subsection D of §

23.1-902

shall receive instruction or training on positive behavior interventions and supports; crisis prevention and de-escalation; the use of physical restraint and seclusion, consistent with regulations of the Board of Education; and appropriate alternative methods to reduce and prevent the need for the use of physical restraint and seclusion;

Every person seeking initial licensure or renewal of a license shall complete instruction or training in cultural competency;

Every person seeking initial licensure or renewal of a license with an endorsement in history and social sciences shall complete instruction in African American history, as prescribed by the Board;

Every person seeking renewal of a license as a teacher shall complete training in the instruction of students with disabilities that includes (i) differentiating instruction for students depending on their needs; (ii) understanding the role of general education teachers on the individualized education program team; (iii) implementing effective models of collaborative instruction, including co-teaching; and (iv) understanding the goals and benefits of inclusive education for all students. and

Every person seeking initial licensure with an endorsement in early/primary education preschool through grade three, elementary education preschool through grade six, special education general curriculum kindergarten through grade 12, special education deaf and hard of hearing preschool through grade 12, or special education blindness/visual impairments preschool through grade 12 or as a reading specialist shall complete study in science-based reading research and evidence-based literacy instruction.

No teacher who seeks a provisional license shall be required to meet any requirement set forth in subdivision D 1, 3, 6, or 8 as a condition of such licensure, but each such teacher shall complete each such requirement during the first year of provisional licensure.

The Board shall issue a license to an individual seeking initial licensure who has not completed professional assessments as prescribed by the Board, if such individual (i) holds a provisional license that will expire within three months or, at the discretion of the school board and division superintendent, within six months if the individual has received a satisfactory mid-year performance review in the current school year; (ii) is employed by a school board; (iii) is recommended for licensure by the division superintendent; (iv) has attempted, unsuccessfully, to obtain a qualifying score on the professional assessments as prescribed by the Board; (v) has received an evaluation rating of proficient or above on the performance standards for each year of the provisional license, and such evaluation was conducted in a manner consistent with the Guidelines for Uniform Performance Standards and Evaluation Criteria for Teachers, Principals, and Superintendents; and (vi) meets all other requirements for initial licensure.

Each local school board or division superintendent may waive for any individual whom it seeks to employ as a career and technical education teacher and who is also seeking initial licensure or renewal of a license with an endorsement in the area of career and technical education any applicable requirement set forth in subsection C or subdivision D 2, 4, or 6.

The Board’s regulations shall require that initial licensure for principals and assistant principals be contingent upon passage of an assessment as prescribed by the Board.

The Board shall establish criteria in its regulations to effectuate the substitution of experiential learning for coursework for those persons seeking initial licensure through an alternate route as defined in Board regulations. Such alternate routes shall include eligibility for any individual to receive, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a renewable one-year license to teach in public high schools in the Commonwealth if he has:

Received a graduate degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education;

Completed at least 30 credit hours of teaching experience as an instructor at a regionally accredited institution of higher education;

Received qualifying scores on the professional teacher's assessments prescribed by the Board, including the communication and literacy assessment and the content-area assessment for the endorsement sought. The literacy assessment for any individual seeking initial licensure through an alternate route with an endorsement in early/primary education preschool through grade three, elementary education preschool through grade six, special education general curriculum kindergarten through grade 12, special education deaf and hard of hearing preschool through grade 12, or special education blindness/visual impairments preschool through grade 12 or as a reading specialist shall include a rigorous test of science-based reading research and evidence-based literacy instruction; and

Met the requirements set forth in subdivisions D 1 and 3.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Board (i) may provide for the issuance of a provisional license, valid for a period not to exceed three years, pursuant to subdivision D 5 or to any person who does not meet the requirements of this section or any other requirement for licensure imposed by law; (ii) shall provide for the issuance of a provisional license, valid for a period not to exceed three years, to any former member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the Virginia National Guard who has received an honorable discharge and has the appropriate level of experience or training but does not meet the requirements for a renewable license; and (iii) may provide for the issuance of a provisional license, valid for a period not to exceed three years, to any individual who has held within the last five years a valid and officially issued and recognized license or certification to teach issued by an entity outside of the United States but does not meet the requirements for a renewable license if the individual's license or certification to teach has been evaluated and verified by an entity approved by the Department.

The Board’s licensure regulations shall also provide for licensure by reciprocity:

With comparable endorsement areas for those individuals holding a valid out-of-state teaching license and national certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards or a nationally recognized certification program approved by the Board of Education. The application for such individuals shall require evidence of such valid licensure and national certification and shall not require official student transcripts;

For any spouse of an active duty or reserve member of the Armed Forces of the United States or a member of the Virginia National Guard who has obtained a valid out-of-state license, with full credentials and without deficiencies, that is in force at the time the application for a Virginia license is received by the Department. Each such individual shall establish a file in the Department by submitting a complete application packet, which shall include official student transcripts and an official copy of the military permanent assignment orders of the individual’s spouse. No service requirements or licensing assessments shall be required for any such individual. The Department shall determine and communicate such individual’s eligibility for licensure by reciprocity within 15 business days of receipt of the complete application packet; and

For individuals who have obtained a valid out-of-state license, with full credentials and without deficiencies, that is in force at the time the application for a Virginia license is received by the Department. Each such individual shall establish a file in the Department by submitting a complete application packet, which shall include official student transcripts. No service requirements or licensing assessments shall be required for any such individual.

The Board shall include in its regulations an alternate route to licensure for elementary education preschool through grade six and an alternate route to licensure for special education general curriculum kindergarten through grade 12. Each such alternate route to licensure shall require individuals to (i) meet the qualifying scores on the content area assessment prescribed by the Board for the endorsements sought and (ii) complete an alternative certification program that provides training in the pedagogy and methodology of the respective content or special education areas prescribed by the Board. The curriculum of any such alternative certification program shall be approved by the Board. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the Board from establishing other alternate routes to licensure.

The Board, in its regulations providing for licensure by reciprocity established pursuant to subsection K, shall (i) permit applicants to submit third-party employment verification forms and (ii) grant special consideration to individuals who have successfully completed a program offered by a provider that is accredited by the Council for the Accreditation of Educator Preparation.

The Board shall develop guidelines that establish a process to permit a school board or any organization sponsored by a school board to petition the Board for approval of an alternate route to licensure that may be used to meet the requirements for a provisional or renewable license or any endorsement. Any such alternate route may include alternatives to the regulatory requirements for teacher preparation, including alternative professional assessments and coursework. The petitioner may proffer or the Board may impose conditions in conjunction with the approval of such petition.

History.

2006, cc. 27, 349; 2008, cc. 474, 827; 2012, c. 365; 2013, cc. 498, 530, 588, 650; 2014, c. 79; 2015, cc. 385, 562; 2016, cc. 389, 649; 2017, cc. 240, 247, 255, 520, 688, 783; 2018, cc. 711, 745, 746, 747, 748, 749; 2019, cc. 63, 407, 409, 587; 2020, cc. 513, 640, 870; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 23, 24, 451, 452; 2022, cc. 545, 546, 656, 657, 549, 550.

§ 22.1-298.2.
Regulations governing education preparation programs.

As used in this section, “education preparation program” includes four-year bachelor’s degree programs in teacher education.

Education preparation programs shall meet the requirements for accreditation and program approval as prescribed by the Board of Education in its regulations.

The Board of Education regulations shall provide for education preparation programs offered by institutions of higher education, Virginia public school divisions, and certified providers for alternate routes to licensure.

The Board may prescribe requirements for admission to Virginia’s approved education preparation programs in its regulations.

The Board shall establish accountability measures for approved education programs. Data shall be submitted to the Board on not less than a biennial basis.

The Board shall review and amend its regulations governing general education teacher preparation programs for kindergarten through twelfth grade to ensure graduates are required to demonstrate proficiency in (i) differentiating instruction for students depending on their needs; (ii) understanding the role of general education teachers on the individualized education program team; (iii) implementing effective models of collaborative instruction, including co-teaching; and (iv) understanding the goals and benefits of inclusive education for all students.

The Board shall review and amend its regulations governing administrator preparation programs to ensure graduates are required to demonstrate comprehension of (i) key special education laws and regulations, (ii) individualized education program development, (iii) the roles and responsibilities of special education teachers, and (iv) appropriate behavior management practices.

History.

2006, cc. 27, 349; 2018, cc. 518, 748, 749; 2019, cc. 63, 407; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451, 452.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, cl. 5 was codified as subsection F of this section and
Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, cl. 6 was codified as subsection G of this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 518, 748 and 749 are identical, and added the definition for “Education preparation program” in subsection A.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 63 and 407 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “Assessment of basic skills’ means an assessment prescribed by the Board of Education that an individual must take prior to admission into an approved education preparation program, as prescribed by the Board of Education in its regulations” and made related changes; and in subsection D, deleted the first sentence, which read: “The Board shall prescribe an assessment of basic skills for individuals seeking entry into an approved education preparation program and shall establish a minimum passing score for such assessment” and deleted “other” preceding “requirements” in the second sentence.

§ 22.1-298.2:1.
(Contingent effective date — see note) Teacher employment data; education preparation programs.

The Department of Education shall aggregate and report to each education preparation program the following teacher employment data on such program’s graduates, as available and to the extent that such data does not reveal personally identifiable information: the total number of graduates who obtain full licensure within three years of graduation; the percentage of all graduates who teach within three years of graduation; the total number of graduates employed in the Commonwealth by school division, graduation year, and type of school; the school characteristics, attributes of students, and educational outcomes where graduates initially taught; and information on teacher transfers and departures relative to initial employment.

History.

2019, c. 598.

Contingent effective date.

Acts 2019, c. 598, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective upon the implementation of an automated teacher licensure and intake system by the Department of Education.”

§ 22.1-298.3.
Students with autism spectrum disorders; training required of personnel.

Each school board shall ensure that aides assigned to work with a teacher who has primary oversight of students with autism spectrum disorders receive training in student behavior management within 60 days of assignment to such responsibility.The Board of Education shall provide training standards that school boards may use to fulfill the requirements of this subsection.

The Board of Education shall establish a training program for school board employees who assist in the transportation of students on school buses, including individuals employed to operate school buses and school bus aides, on autism spectrum disorders, including the characteristics of autism spectrum disorders, strategies for interacting with students with autism spectrum disorders, and collaboration with other employees who assist in the transportation of students on school buses. Each school board employee who assists in the transportation of students with autism spectrum disorders on school buses shall participate in such training program.

History.

2012, c. 755; 2018, c. 586.

Cross references.

As to Virginia missing person with autism alert program, see §

52-34.13

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 755, cl. 2, provides: “That the Board of Education, in consultation with Virginia Commonwealth University, shall develop online training that school divisions may use to fulfill the requirements of § 22.1-298.3 of the Code of Virginia. Such training shall be made available to local school divisions free of charge.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 586, designated the existing provisions as subsection A and added subsection B; in subsection A, deleted “By September 1, 2014,” at the beginning, deleted the former second sentence, which read “School boards may provide such training to other employees, including transportation employees” and substituted “school boards” for “school divisions” and “subsection” for “section.”

§ 22.1-298.4.
Teacher preparation programs; learning disabilities.

The Department of Education shall collaborate with the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia to ensure that all teacher preparation programs offered at public institutions of higher education in the Commonwealth or otherwise available convey information on the identification of students at risk for learning disabilities, including dyslexia, other language-based learning disabilities, and attention deficit disorder.

History.

2016, c. 649.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 649, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

§ 22.1-298.5.
Regulations governing licensure; endorsement in dual language instruction pre-kindergarten through grade six.

As used in this section, “dual language instruction” means instruction that is delivered in English and in a second language.

In its regulations governing licensure established pursuant to § 22.1-298.1, the Board shall provide for licensure of teachers with an endorsement in dual language instruction pre-kindergarten through grade six. In establishing the requirements for such endorsement, the Board shall require, at minimum, coursework in dual language education; bilingual literacy development; methods of second language acquisition; theories of second language acquisition; instructional strategies for classroom management for the elementary classroom; and content-based curriculum, instruction, and assessment.

Each teacher with an endorsement in dual language instruction pre-kindergarten through grade six is exempt from the Virginia Communication and Literacy Assessment requirement but is subject to the subject matter-specific professional teacher’s assessment requirements.

No teacher with an endorsement in dual language instruction pre-kindergarten through grade six is required to obtain an additional endorsement in early/primary education pre-kindergarten through grade three or elementary education pre-kindergarten through grade six in order to teach in pre-kindergarten through grade six.

History.

2018, c. 391.

§ 22.1-298.6.
Mental health awareness training.

Each school board shall adopt and implement policies that require each teacher and other relevant personnel, as determined by the school board, employed on a full-time basis, to complete a mental health awareness training or similar program at least once.

Each school board shall provide required personnel the training required by subsection A and may contract with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, a community services board, a behavioral health authority, a nonprofit organization, or other certified trainer as defined in §

37.2-312.2

to provide such training. Such training may be provided via an online module.

History.

2020, cc. 471, 472.

§ 22.1-298.7.
Teachers and other licensed school board employees; cultural competency training.

Each school board shall adopt and implement policies that require each teacher and any other school board employee holding a license issued by the Board to complete cultural competency training, in accordance with guidance issued by the Board, at least every two years.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 23, 24.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 23 and 24, cl. 2 provides: “That no later than December 31, 2021, the Board of Education shall issue guidance that establishes minimum standards for the cultural competency training required pursuant to § 22.1-298.7 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 23 and 24, cl. 3 provides: “That each school board employee who is required to complete a cultural competency training pursuant to § 22.1-298.7 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall complete at least one such training no later than the beginning of the 2022-2023 school year.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 22.1-299.
License required of teachers; provisional licenses; exceptions.

No teacher shall be regularly employed by a school board or paid from public funds unless such teacher holds a license or provisional license issued by the Board.

Notwithstanding the provision in § 22.1-298.1 that the provisional license is limited to three years, the following exceptions shall apply:

If a teacher employed in the Commonwealth under a provisional license is activated or deployed for military service within a school year (July 1-June 30), an additional year shall be added to the teacher’s provisional license for each school year or portion thereof during which the teacher is activated or deployed. The additional year shall be granted the year following the return of the teacher from deployment or activation.

The Board shall extend for at least one additional year, but for no more than two additional years, the three-year provisional license of a teacher upon receiving from the division superintendent (i) a recommendation for such extension and (ii) satisfactory performance evaluations for such teacher for each year of the original three-year provisional license.

The Board shall extend for at least one additional year, but for no more than two additional years, the three-year provisional license of a teacher employed in an accredited private elementary or secondary school or a school for students with disabilities that is licensed pursuant to Chapter 16 (§ 22.1-319 et seq.) upon receiving from the school administrator of such school (i) a recommendation for such extension and (ii) satisfactory performance evaluations for such teacher for each year of the original three-year provisional license.

In accordance with regulations prescribed by the Board, a person not meeting the requirements for a license or provisional license may be employed and paid from public funds by a school board temporarily as a substitute teacher to meet an emergency.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-204; 1954, c. 638; 1958, c. 300; 1979, c. 532; 1980, c. 559; 1992, c. 132; 2000, c. 689; 2008, c. 51; 2013, cc. 588, 650; 2018, cc. 748, 749; 2020, cc. 172, 639.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 144 S 3 f, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding any provisions of § 22.1-299, Code of Virginia, and in order to achieve the priorities of the Joint Subcommittee on Early Childhood Care and Education for exploring the feasibility of and barriers to mixed delivery preschool systems in Virginia, recipients of a Mixed-Delivery Preschool grant shall be provided maximum flexibility within their respective pilot initiative in order to fully implement the associated goals and objectives of the pilot. Recipients of a Mixed-Delivery Preschool grant and divisions participating in such grant pilot activities shall be exempted from all regulatory and statutory provisions related to teacher licensure requirements and qualifications when paid by public funds within the confines of the Mixed-Delivery Preschool pilot initiative.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 689 added the language beginning “or a three” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 51, effective February 29, 2008, added the last three sentences in the first paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and in the first paragraph, deleted “or a three-year local eligibility license issued by a local school board pursuant to § 22.1-299.3” at the end of the first sentence, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Local school divisions may grant similar extensions for local eligibility licenses in their discretion.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 748 and 749 are identical, and redesignated the existing provisions and subsections A through C and added subdivision B 2; added “the following exceptions shall apply” at the end of the introductory paragraph of subsection B; in subdivision B 1; substituted “shall be added” for “will be added” and “year shall be granted the year following” for “year or years shall be granted the following year or years after”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 172 and 639 added subdivision B 3, which are same except that c. 639 includes “an accredited private elementary or secondary school or.” The subdivision has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Law Review.

For comment, “The First Amendment and Licensing Biology Teachers in Creationism,” see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (1983).

§ 22.1-299.1.
Repealed by Acts 1990, c. 970.

§ 22.1-299.2.
National Teacher Certification Incentive Reward Program and Fund.

From such funds as may be appropriated for such purpose and from such gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds as may be received on its behalf, there is hereby established the National Teacher Certification Incentive Reward Program (the “Program”), to be administered by the Board of Education, and a special nonreverting fund within the state treasury known as the National Teacher Certification Incentive Reward Program Fund (the “Fund”). The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller, and any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such funds shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it.The State Treasurer shall manage the Fund, subject to the authority of the Board of Education to provide for its disbursement. The Fund shall be disbursed to award incentive grants to public school teachers obtaining national certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards.To the extent funds are available in the Fund, teachers who obtain national certification shall receive an initial state-funded award of $5,000 and a subsequent award of $2,500 each year for the life of the certificate. Such awards shall continue to be paid upon renewal of the certificate. The Board shall establish procedures for determining amounts of awards if the moneys in the Fund are not sufficient to award each eligible teacher the appropriate award amount.

The Board may issue guidelines governing the Program as it deems necessary and appropriate.

History.

1999, cc. 1030, 1032, 1037.

§ 22.1-299.3.
Repealed by Acts 2013, cc. 588 and 650, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-299.3, pertaining to three-year local eligibility license, derived from Acts 2000, c. 689; 2004, c. 920.

Former § 22.1-299.3 was also amended by Acts 2013, cc. 498 and 530.

§ 22.1-299.4.
Teach For America license.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Board shall issue a two-year provisional license, hereafter referred to as the Teach For America license, to any participant in Teach For America, a nationwide nonprofit organization focused on closing the academic achievement gaps between students in high-income and low-income areas, who submits an application and meets the following criteria:

Holds, at minimum, a baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education;

Has met the requirements prescribed by the Board for all endorsements sought or has met the qualifying scores on the content area assessment prescribed by the Board for the endorsements sought;

Possesses good moral character according to criteria developed by the Board;

Has been offered and has accepted placement in Teach For America;

Has successfully completed pre-service training and is participating in the professional development requirements of Teach For America, including teaching frameworks, curricula, lesson planning, instructional delivery, classroom management, assessment and evaluation of student progress, classroom diversity, and literacy development;

Has an offer of employment from a local school board to teach in a public elementary or secondary school in the Commonwealth or a preschool program that receives state funds pursuant to § 22.1-289.09; and

Receives a recommendation from the employing school division for a Teach For America license in the endorsement area in which the individual seeks to be licensed.

In addition to the criteria set forth in subsection A, any individual who seeks an endorsement in early childhood, early/primary, or elementary education shall either (i) agree to complete such coursework in the teaching of reading as may be prescribed by the Board pursuant to regulation during the first year of employment or (ii) achieve a passing score on a reading instructional assessment prescribed by the Board pursuant to regulation.

Teachers issued a Teach For America provisional license shall not be eligible for continuing contract status while employed under the authority of a Teach For America license and shall be subject to the probationary terms of employment specified in § 22.1-303.

The Board may extend any Teach For America license for one additional year upon request of the employing school division, provided that no Teach For America license shall exceed a total of three years in length.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon completion of at least two years of full-time teaching experience in a public elementary or secondary school in the Commonwealth or a preschool program that receives state funds pursuant to § 22.1-289.09, an individual holding a Teach For America license shall be eligible to receive a renewable license if he has (i) achieved satisfactory scores on all professional teacher assessments required by the Board and (ii) received satisfactory evaluations at the conclusion of each year of employment.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Board shall issue a Teach For America license to any individual who (i) has completed two years of successful teaching in the Teach For America program in another state, (ii) is not eligible to receive a renewable license, and (iii) meets the criteria set forth in subsection A.

History.

2013, cc. 53, 440; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subdivision A 6 at the end and in subsection E, substituted “§ 22.1-289.09” for “subsection C of § 22.1-199.1.”